Utah statutes.
61-2g-306.   Renewal of license, certification, or registration.

(1)  To renew a license, certification, or registration, before the license, certification, or registration expires, the holder of the license, certification, or registration shall submit to the division in compliance with procedures set through the concurrence of the division and the board:

(a)  an application for renewal;

(b)  a fee established by the division and the board, in accordance with Section 63J-1-504; and

(c)  evidence in the form prescribed by the division of having completed the continuing education requirements for renewal specified in this chapter.

(2) (a)  A license, certification, or registration expires if it is not renewed on or before its expiration date.

(b)  For a period of 30 days after the expiration date, a license, certification, or registration may be reinstated upon:

(i)  payment of a renewal fee and a late fee determined through the concurrence of the division and the board; and

(ii)  satisfying the continuing education requirements specified in Section 61-2g-307.

(c)  After the 30-day period described in Subsection (2)(b), and until six months after the expiration date, a license, certification, or registration may be reinstated by:

(i)  paying a renewal fee and a reinstatement fee determined through the concurrence of the division and the board; and

(ii)  satisfying the continuing education requirements specified in Section 61-2g-307.

(d)  After the six-month period described in Subsection (2)(c), and until one year after the expiration date, a license, certification, or registration may be reinstated by:

(i)  paying a renewal fee and a reinstatement fee determined through the concurrence of the division and the board in accordance with Section 63J-1-504;

(ii)  providing proof acceptable to the division, with the concurrence of the board, of the person having satisfied the continuing education requirements of Section 61-2g-307; and

(iii)  providing proof acceptable to the division, with the concurrence of the board, of the person completing 24 hours of continuing education:

(A)  in addition to the requirements in Section 61-2g-307; and

(B)  on a subject determined by the division by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

(e)  The division shall relicense, recertify, or reregister a person who does not renew that person's license, certification, or registration within one year after the expiration date as prescribed for an original application.

(f)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), the division may extend the term of a license, certification, or registration that would expire under Subsection (2)(a) except for the extension if:

(i) (A)  the person complies with the requirements of this section to renew the license, certification, or registration; and

(B)  the application for renewal remains pending at the time of the extension; or

(ii)  at the time of the extension, there is pending under this chapter a disciplinary action.

(3)  A person who is licensed, certified, or registered under this chapter shall notify the division of the following by sending the division a signed statement within 10 business days of:

(a)  a conviction of, or the entry of a plea in abeyance to:

(i)  a felony; or

(ii)  a misdemeanor involving financial services or a financial services-related business, fraud, a false statement or omission, theft or wrongful taking of property, bribery, perjury, forgery, counterfeiting, or extortion;

(b)  the potential resolution of a felony or of a misdemeanor described in Subsection (3)(a)(ii) by:

(i)  a diversion agreement; or

(ii)  any other agreement under which a criminal charge is suspended for a period of time;

(c)  the suspension, revocation, surrender, cancellation, or denial of a professional license, certification, or registration of the person, whether the license, certification, or registration is issued by this state or another jurisdiction; or

(d)  the entry of a cease and desist order or a temporary or permanent injunction:

(i)  against the person by a court or administrative agency; and

(ii)  on the basis of:

(A)  conduct or a practice involving an act regulated by this chapter; or

(B)  conduct involving fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit.

(4)  The board, with the concurrence of the division, shall enforce the reporting requirement of Subsection (3) pursuant to Section 61-2g-502.

